District of Columbia statutes.
23-1305

Duties of director; compensation.

The Director of the agency shall be responsible for the supervision and execution of the duties of the agency. The Director shall be compensated as a member of the Senior Executive Service pursuant to subchapter VIII of chapter 53 of title 5, United States Code.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 642, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 761, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11271(a)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 23-1305.
1973 Ed., § 23-1305.

References in Text

“Subchapter VIII of chapter 53 of title 5, United States Code,” referred to in this section, is codified at 5 U.S.C. § 5381 et seq.